Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2383SV (4) 91 sb/js S.F. 260 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 481A.41 Tree stands for hunting 1 deer on public land ââ identification ââ prohibition. 2 1. A person shall not place a tree stand for hunting 3 deer on public land unless the stand is affixed with and 4 exhibits a metal plate that plainly shows the department-issued 5 identification number of the owner of the stand. A person who 6 fails to properly identify a tree stand placed on public land 7 belonging to the person is subject to a scheduled fine under 8 section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ . 9 2. An owner of a tree stand placed on public land shall not 10 be held liable for damage to personal property or an injury 11 resulting from another personâs use of the tree stand. 12 3. The natural resource commission shall adopt rules 13 pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this section. 14 Sec. 2. Section 481A.90, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 2. This section does not prohibit the owner , the ownerâs 17 agent, or a drainage district from destroying a den or 18 breaching or altering a beaver dam to protect the ownerâs 19 property. 20 Sec. 3. Section 481A.92, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 1. A person shall not use or attempt to use colony traps in 23 taking, capturing, trapping, or killing any game or fur-bearing 24 animals except muskrats as determined by rule of the 25 commission. Box traps capable of capturing more than one game 26 or fur-bearing animal at each setting are prohibited. A valid 27 hunting license is required for box trapping cottontail rabbits 28 and squirrels. All traps and snares used for the taking of 29 fur-bearing animals shall have a metal tag attached plainly 30 labeled with the userâs department-issued identification number 31 or name and address. All traps and snares, except those which 32 that are placed entirely under water, shall be checked at 33 least once every twenty-four hours. Officers appointed by the 34 department may confiscate such traps and snares found in use 35 -1- LSB 2383SV (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. 260 that are not properly labeled or checked. 1 Sec. 4. Section 481A.95, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 3 following: 4 2. Fees for a license issued under this section shall 5 be no more than fifty dollars annually for a resident or a 6 nonresident fur dealer. 7 Sec. 5. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 8 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9 b. For violations of section 481A.41, subsection 1, sections 10 481A.54 , 481A.69 , 481A.71 , 481A.72 , 482.6 , 483A.3 , 483A.6 , 11 483A.8A , 483A.19 , 483A.27 , and 483A.27A , the scheduled fine is 12 thirty dollars. 13